District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-520

Lessee’s incidental and consequential damages.

(a)

Incidental damages resulting from a lessor’s default include expenses reasonably incurred in inspection, receipt, transportation, and care and custody of goods rightfully rejected or goods the acceptance of which is justifiably revoked, any commercially reasonable charges, expenses or commissions in connection with effecting cover, and any other reasonable expense incident to the default.

(b)

Consequential damages resulting from a lessor’s default include:

(1)

Any loss resulting from general or particular requirements and needs of which the lessor at the time of contracting had reason to know and which could not reasonably be prevented by cover or otherwise; and

(2)

Injury to person or property proximately resulting from any breach of warranty.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

History

This section is referenced in § 28:2A-508.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-520.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-715.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing terminology and practices.

Purposes: Subsection (1), a revised version of the provisions of Section 2-715(1), lists some examples of incidental damages resulting from a lessor’s default; the list is not exhaustive. Subsection (1) makes clear that it applies not only to rightful rejection, but also to justifiable revocation.

Subsection (2), a revised version of the provisions of Section 2-715(2), lists some examples of consequential damages resulting from a lessor’s default; the list is not exhaustive.

Cross References:Section 2-715.

Definitional Cross References: “Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

“Knows”. Section 1-201(25).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).

“Person”. Section 1-201(30).

“Receipt”. Section 2-103(1)(c).

Uniform Commercial Code Comment